District of Columbia statutes.
47-2101

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter:

(1)

“Closing-out sale” means and includes any sale in connection with which there is any representation by the person conducting such sale that the sale is being conducted, or is required or compelled to be conducted, for reasons of economic or business distress, inability to continue business at the same location, or the age or health of the owner or owners of the business, and the term “closing-out sale” shall include but not be limited to, all sales advertised, represented, or held forth under the designation of “going out of business,” “discontinuance of business,” “selling out,” “liquidation,” “lost our lease,” “must vacate,” “forced out,” “removal,” or any other designation of like meaning.

(2)

“Person” means and includes individuals, partnerships, voluntary associations, and corporations.

History

Sept. 1, 1959, 73 Stat. 449, Pub. L. 86-219, § 1
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2101.
1973 Ed., § 47-3001.